Maryland, session 2026, SB0487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–401.
Except as provided in § 4–402 of this subtitle, and subject to the venue provisions of
Title 6 of this article, the District Court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction in:
(13) A proceeding for a civil infraction under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article;
7–301.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the
court costs in a traffic case, including parking and impounding cases, cases under §
21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1414, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article in which costs are imposed, and cases under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article
in which costs are imposed:
(i) Are $22.50; and
(ii) Shall also be applicable to those cases in which the defendant
elects to waive the defendant’s right to trial and pay the fine or penalty deposit established
by the Chief Judge of the District Court by administrative regulation.
(f) (1) This subsection does not apply to a traffic case under § 21–202.1,
§ 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 21–1414 of the Transportation Article or to a parking
or impounding case.
(2) In a traffic case under subsection (a)(1) of this section the court shall
add a $7.50 surcharge to any fine imposed by the court.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued under § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, §
21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days before
the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
4. A work zone speed control system;
5. A stop sign monitoring system;
6. A school bus monitoring camera;
7. A bus lane monitoring system; or
8. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a political subdivision shall provide that, in a contested case, the
penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A vehicle height monitoring system;
2. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
3. A speed monitoring system;
– 3 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
4. A work zone speed control system;
5. A stop sign monitoring system;
6. A school bus monitoring camera;
7. A bus lane monitoring system; or
8. A noise abatement monitoring system.
(iii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a State agency shall provide that, in an uncontested or A contested
case, the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
2. A work zone speed control system;
3. A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM;
4. A speed monitoring system; or
[4.] 5. A bus lane monitoring system.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this
paragraph, and paragraph (6) of this subsection, civil penalties resulting from citations
issued using a vehicle height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system,
speed monitoring system, work zone speed control system, SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, bus
lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are collected by the
District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection,
from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems; and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
10–311.
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 [or], § 21–810, OR § 21–810.1 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of Title 21, Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(h) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, or bus lane
monitoring system or a recorded image and any relevant recorded audio produced by a noise
abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring device is admissible
as otherwise provided by law.
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(a) In this section, “recorded image” or “recorded images” has the meaning stated
in § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or §
24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) an automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system operated
under § 21–704.1 of the Transportation Article;
(3) a school bus monitoring camera operated under § 21–706.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(4) a stop sign monitoring system operated under § 21–707.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(5) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
– 5 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article;
(7) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED
UNDER § 21–810.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(8) a bus lane monitoring system operated under § 21–1134 of the
Transportation Article;
[(8)] (9) a noise abatement monitoring system operated under § 22–612
of the Transportation Article; or
[(9)] (10) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of
the Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:
(1) as required in § 12–113.1, § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article;
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under § 21–202.1, §
21–704.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or
§ 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Insurance
11–215.
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
11–318.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–113.1.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) Traffic control signal monitoring systems under § 21–202.1 of this
article;
(2) Automated railroad grade crossing enforcement systems under §
21–704.1 of this article;
(3) School bus monitoring cameras under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) Stop sign monitoring systems under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5) Speed monitoring systems under § 21–809 of this article;
(6) Work zone speed control systems under § 21–810 of this article;
(7) SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS UNDER §
21–810.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(8) Bus lane monitoring systems under § 21–1134 of this article;
[(8)] (9) Noise abatement monitoring systems under § 22–612 of this
article;
[(9)] (10) Vehicle height monitoring systems under § 24–111.3 of this
article; and
[(10)] (11) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, an
agency may not access or use a recorded image or associated data without a warrant,
subpoena, or court order unless the access or use is for an appropriate traffic enforcement
purpose.
– 7 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
12–118.
(c) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, notwithstanding any other law and in addition to any other exceptions provided
by law, all costs, fines, penalties, and forfeitures received by or paid to the District Court
under the Maryland Vehicle Law shall be collected and remitted as provided in the Courts
Article.
(2) The Comptroller shall distribute revenue from the civil fines collected
through use of a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency under §
21–810 of this article to a special fund, to be used only as provided in subsection (e) of this
section.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE REVENUE FROM THE
CIVIL FINES COLLECTED THROUGH THE USE OF A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM CONTROLLED BY A STATE AGENCY UNDER § 21–810.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE TO A SPECIAL FUND TO BE USED ONLY AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) (I) MONEY IN THE SPECIAL FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED FIRST TO THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING AND
ADMINISTERING SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS.
(II) AFTER THE DISTRIBUTION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE REMAINING BALANCE SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE
TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUND FOR:
1. HIGHWAY SAFETY PURPOSES; AND
2. STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SYSTEM
PRESERVATION.
(2) MONEY DISTRIBUTED TO THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT WOULD OTHERWISE BE
APPROPRIATED FOR THE USES DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
(T–1) “SAFETY CORRIDOR” MEANS A SEGMENT OF A HIGHWAY THAT IS
IDENTIFIED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION AS AN AREA OF HIGH RISK
TO VULNERABLE ROAD USERS IN A VULNERABLE ROAD USER SAFETY ASSESSMENT
PREPARED UNDER 23 U.S.C. § 148.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(v) An ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of a
local jurisdiction under this paragraph shall provide that, if the local jurisdiction moves or
places a mobile or stationary speed monitoring system to or at a location where a speed
monitoring system had not previously been moved or placed, the local jurisdiction may not
issue a citation for a violation recorded by that speed monitoring system:
1. Until signage is installed in accordance with
subparagraph (viii) of this paragraph; and
2. For at least the first 15 calendar days after the signage is
installed.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this title,
with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was established
using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
– 9 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line;
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
7. Subject to subparagraph (vii)4 of this paragraph, by the
State Highway Administration on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County;
8. By the Maryland Transportation Authority on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County; [or]
9. Subject to subparagraph (xii) of this paragraph, in
Montgomery County on a highway identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as a highway that is at high risk
for motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death; OR
10. IN A SAFETY CORRIDOR BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION
ON:
A. A HIGHWAY UNDER ITS JURISDICTION; OR
B. A STATE HIGHWAY IF AUTHORIZED UNDER A PERMIT
ISSUED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 21–810.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(d) (5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty, in accordance with instructions on the
citation, directly to the political subdivision, the District Court, THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, or the Maryland Transportation Authority, as appropriate; or
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
21–810.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR
LONGER.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY;
OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS AN IMAGE RECORDED BY A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE REAR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE;
2. AT LEAST TWO TIME–STAMPED IMAGES OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE THAT INCLUDE THE SAME STATIONARY OBJECT NEAR THE MOTOR
VEHICLE; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(4) “SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM AS DEFINED UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT
IS PLACED AND USED IN A SAFETY CORRIDOR.
(5) “SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR”
MEANS A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS
CONTRACTOR THAT OPERATES A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM.
(6) (I) “VULNERABLE ROAD USER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL ON A
HIGHWAY WHO IS NOT TRAVELING IN A MOTOR VEHICLE.
(II) “VULNERABLE ROAD USER” INCLUDES PEDESTRIANS,
BICYCLISTS, OTHER CYCLISTS, PERSONS USING A PERSONAL CONVEYANCE OR A
MOBILITY DEVICE SUCH AS A WHEELCHAIR, AND PERSONS ON FOOT IN A HIGHWAY
WORK ZONE.
(B) (1) (I) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM THAT
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE AUTHORIZED BY THE
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION AND USED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF MOTOR
VEHICLES TRAVELING ON A STATE HIGHWAY WITHIN A SAFETY CORRIDOR.
(II) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY ISSUE A
PERMIT AUTHORIZING A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT OPERATES ITS OWN PROGRAM
OF SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS OR WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEMS TO
PLACE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–809 OF THIS SUBTITLE, SAFETY CORRIDOR
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON STATE HIGHWAYS IN SAFETY CORRIDORS WITHIN
ITS JURISDICTION.
(2) (I) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE
USED ONLY IF, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND MANUAL ON UNIFORM
TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES, A CONSPICUOUS ROAD SIGN IS PLACED AT A
REASONABLE DISTANCE CONSISTENT WITH NATIONAL GUIDELINES BEFORE THE
SAFETY CORRIDOR ALERTING DRIVERS THAT A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE
IN OPERATION IN THE SAFETY CORRIDOR.
(II) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR DOES NOT NEED TO BE PRESENT IN PERSON OR REMOTELY AT THE
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
SAFETY CORRIDOR WHEN A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN
USE.
(III) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE
A MOBILE UNIT OR A STATIONARY UNIT.
(3) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE USED
ONLY TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF VEHICLES THAT ARE TRAVELING AT SPEEDS AT
LEAST 12 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT.
(4) (I) A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM SHALL
UNDERGO AN ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN INDEPENDENT
CALIBRATION LABORATORY.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT:
1. SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
2. SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(5) IF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR
MOVES OR PLACES A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM TO OR AT A
SAFETY CORRIDOR WHERE A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM HAD
NOT PREVIOUSLY BEEN MOVED OR PLACED WITHIN THE PREVIOUS YEAR, CITATIONS
MAY NOT BE ISSUED FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY THAT SAFETY CORRIDOR
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) UNTIL SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(II) FOR AT LEAST THE FIRST 15 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER THE
SIGNAGE IS INSTALLED THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL MAIL A
WARNING NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION RECORDED BY THE
SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM DURING THE FIRST 90 30 DAYS
THAT THE SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM IS IN OPERATION.
(6) THE PROCUREMENT OF OR RELATING TO A SAFETY CORRIDOR
SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL BE
CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 1 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
– 13 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(7) THE PLACEMENT OF A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING
SYSTEM SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION:
(I) BASED ON AN ANALYSIS USING GENERALLY ACCEPTED
TRAFFIC ENGINEERING PRACTICES TO DETERMINE AN APPROPRIATE LOCATION IN
A SAFETY CORRIDOR, AND AFTER CONSULTATION WITH THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL
JURISDICTION; AND
(II) IN A MANNER THAT IS NOT REDUNDANT WITH A SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE DRIVER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF AN IMAGE OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE
BEING OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED:
(I) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 12 AND 15, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $40;
(II) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 16 AND 19, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $70;
(III) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 20 AND 29, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $120;
(IV) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY BETWEEN 30 AND 39, INCLUSIVE,
MILES PER HOUR, $230; AND
(V) IF THE CITATION ALLEGES THAT THE DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE EXCEEDED THE SPEED LIMIT BY 40 MILES PER HOUR OR MORE,
$425.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
(3) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT
SHALL:
(I) PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) INCLUDE A PLACE ON THE CITATION TO INDICATE THE
AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY
THE CIVIL PENALTY WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL
MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION
THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION PLATE NUMBER OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VI) AT LEAST ONE RECORDED IMAGE OF THE VEHICLE WITH A
DATA BAR IMPRINTED ON THE IMAGE THAT INCLUDES THE SPEED OF THE VEHICLE
AND THE DATE AND TIME THE IMAGE WAS RECORDED;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY MUST BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT UNDER OATH BY AN AUTHORIZED
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR THAT,
BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS BEING
OPERATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE;
– 15 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR
MAY MAIL A WARNING NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR MAY NOT MAIL A
CITATION TO A PERSON WHO IS NOT AN OWNER.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F)(4) OF THIS SECTION, A
CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2
WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THE
STATE, AND NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE
VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(6) TO MAIL THE CITATION OR WARNING NOTICE, THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL USE:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
(I) THE CURRENT MAILING ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION; OR
(II) IF A MAILING ADDRESS IS UNAVAILABLE, THE CURRENT
RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION.
(E) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE OCCURRED AND THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION HAVE BEEN SATISFIED, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY AN AUTHORIZED
STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR, BASED ON
INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES PRODUCED BY A SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEM, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE
CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING ALLEGING A VIOLATION
UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT THE PRESENCE OR TESTIMONY OF THE SAFETY
CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES THE SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR TO BE PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL NOTIFY THE
DISTRICT COURT AND THE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION OR ITS CONTRACTOR THAT ISSUED THE CITATION IN WRITING
NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(F) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE VEHICLE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT DEEMS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
– 17 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND
MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS
NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION,
THE CLERK OF THE COURT MAY PROVIDE TO THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR THE CONTRACTOR THAT ISSUED THE
CITATION A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION REPRESENTATIVE OR THE CONTRACTOR THAT ISSUED
THE CITATION MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION TO THE PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES WAS OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) ANY CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(G) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) REFUSE REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE MOTOR
VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION; OR
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
(2) SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR
THE VIOLATION.
(H) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE;
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF §
26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(I) (1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION,
THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE
ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION
OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(J) (1) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR A CONTRACTOR
DESIGNATED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADMINISTER AND
PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH
THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR PROVIDES, DEPLOYS, OR OPERATES A SAFETY
CORRIDOR SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM FOR THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, THE CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON THE
NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
(K) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS
ESTABLISHING STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR SAFETY CORRIDOR SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS.
26–305.
– 19 –

Ch. 285 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 [or], § 21–810,
OR § 21–810.1 of this article, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter Control Law
under § 10–110 of the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted by
Baltimore City relating to the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under § 10–112 of
the Criminal Law Article, if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, [or] § 21–810,
OR § 21–810.1 of this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has
failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, [or] § 21–810, OR §
21–810.1 of this article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has
failed to appear for trial; or
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.
26–401.
If a person is taken before a District Court commissioner or is given a traffic citation
or a civil citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–810.1, § 21–1414, or §
24–111.3 of this article containing a notice to appear in court, the commissioner or court
shall be one that sits within the county in which the offense allegedly was committed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 285
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 21 –